Hawaii statutes.
[§398-1.5] Posting of notices.
Every employer shall post and keep posted notices clearly setting forth the
rights of employees provided by this chapter in a form prescribed by the
director in conspicuous places in every establishment where any employee is
employed so as to permit the employee to observe readily a copy on the way to
or from the employee's place of employment. [L 2009, c 48, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next